Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.070

Promoting prostitution in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of promoting prostitution in the first degree if he or she knowingly advances prostitution:

(a) By compelling a person by threat or force to engage in prostitution or profits from prostitution which results from such threat or force; or

(b) By compelling a person with a mental incapacity or developmental disability that renders the person incapable of consent to engage in prostitution or profits from prostitution that results from such compulsion.

(2) Promoting prostitution in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2012 c 141 s 1; 2007 c 368 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.070.]